Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 12
Local Officers And Employees — Miscellaneous Provisions

Cross References.

Municipalities and counties required to provide workers' compensation coverage, § 14-26-101 et seq., § 14-60-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Publisher's Notes.

Due to the enactment of subchapter 2 by Acts 1999, Nos. 50 and 332, the existing provisions of this chapter have been designated as subchapter 1.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 24: Approved Feb. 23, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the above employees are not covered by Social Security and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 313, § 3: Approved Mar. 27, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, this Act is necessary to reward faithful servants who have performed their duties good and well and given the best part of their lives and loyal to their respective communities and to properly protect the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1959, No. 271, § 3: Approved Mar. 25, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, this Act is necessary to reward faithful servants who have performed their duties good and well and given the best part of their lives and loyal to their respective communities and to properly protect the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1971, No. 349, § 3: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is presently no law providing for retirement of Treasurers of cities of the first class; that it is essential that provision be made for retirement benefits for such City Treasurers in order to encourage competent and qualified people to seek and accept the position of Treasurer in such cities. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 356, § 6: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the services of competent city clerks and clerk-treasurers are essential to the successful operation of cities of this State and that the providing of adequate retirement benefits of such clerks and clerk-treasurers is essential to rewarding them for years of faithful service to the cities, and the providing of adequate retirement benefits for such clerk or clerk-treasurer is essential to the recruitment of competent and qualified personnel for cities of this State; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish the aforesaid purposes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 421, § 3: Mar. 20, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 147 of 1949 authorized cities of the first and second class to establish Pension and Relief Funds for Paid Non-uniformed Employees and that Section 2 of said Act prohibited employees who leave city employment from receiving a refund of the amounts deducted from their wages for payment to the said Pension and Relief Fund; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable any such employee whose wages have been subject to a deduction for payment into the Pension and Relief Fund of said city to receive a refund thereof upon his leaving city employment. Therefore, and [an] emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 388, § 3: Mar. 18, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the retirement laws of certain second class city mayors should be revised in order to allow the cities to provide adequate retirement benefits; that this Act accomplishes the same and should be given effect immediately in order to provide equitable retirement benefits for the persons covered by this Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1130, § 6: Apr. 13, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law relating to nonuniformed municipal employees pension and relief funds does not grant the board of trustees adequate latitude in the employment of an investment counselor and in investing the funds; that this act gives the boards of trustees of some such pension and relief funds the needed additional authority and should be given effect immediately to enable the boards of trustees of such funds to assure that such funds are as productive as possible. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1615, § 3: Apr. 16, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that former municipal employees often serve as mayors in municipalities in Arkansas; that the former service as a municipal employee provided valuable background knowledge to aid the mayor in the performance of his job as a public official; that time in public employment should count towards the mayor's retirement benefit; and that it is necessary to provide this benefit to former municipal employees as soon as possible and this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 9: Apr. 7, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the statutes relating to payments from the local pension and relief funds need amending in order for the investments of the assets in the local pension and relief funds to be consistent with the practicalities of the market. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1065, § 15, as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 1: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 2: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1065 of 2013 was enacted with an erroneous emergency clause; that the error needs to be rectified as quickly as possible to effect the will of the General Assembly; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will correct and address the error found in the emergency clause of Act 1065 of 2013. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-12-101. Definitions.

As used in this act, “paid nonuniformed employees”:

Means the mayor, city attorney, city treasurer, city clerk, or municipal judge of any city to which this act is applicable when the mayor, city attorney, city treasurer, city clerk, or municipal judge elects to be so included; and

May include the other full-time paid nonuniformed employees of the city.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 1; 1961, No. 501, § 1; 1981, No. 909, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-922; Acts 2003, No. 1281, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges…” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.”
Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1949, No. 147, codified as §§ 24-12-101 — 24-12-118.

24-12-102. Applicability.

This act shall not apply to any city having a paid nonuniformed employees' pension and relief fund prior to February 23, 1949.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-941.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-103. Vote to effect act.

The provisions of this act shall be suspended and inoperative in any city affected by the provisions of the act until made available by a vote favorable thereto of the majority of the qualified electors of the cities participating in any election on the question at a special election called for the purpose of voting on the question.

The election may be held in connection with the first general city election following the passage and approval of this act, but the failure to submit or the failure to adopt at the city or other election shall not bar, abridge, or defeat the right of submission at any subsequent election.

Upon the filing with the county board of election commissioners not later than ninety (90) days before the date of the election requested in a petition signed by twenty (20) or more qualified electors of the city affected and praying that the question of paid nonuniformed employees' pensions and the levying of a tax therefor, not exceeding one and one-half (1½) mills, be submitted, it shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners to call the election in accordance with § 7-11-201 et seq.

If for any reason the question is not voted upon at the next general city election after the passage and approval of this act, the question may be submitted at any other general or special election held in the city as provided in this section.

The question on the ballot shall be as follows:

“FOR Paid Nonuniformed Employees pensions and the levying of a mill tax of (amount here designated on ballot not exceeding one and one-half (1½) mills) therefor
AGAINST Paid Nonuniformed Employees pensions and the levying of a mill tax of (amount here designated on ballot not exceeding one and one-half (1½) mills) therefor

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 22; 1961, No. 501, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-942; Acts 2005, No. 2145, § 65; 2007, No. 1049, § 87; 2009, No. 1480, § 106.

Publisher's Notes.

With reference to the phrase “passage and approval of this act”, Acts 1949, No. 147, was signed by the Governor on February 23, 1949.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§ 7-11-201 et seq.” for “§ 7-5-103(b)” in (c).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-104. Tax levy to support fund.

Annually, a tax not to exceed one and one-half (1½) mills on the dollar of all taxable property in cities of the first class and cities of the second class which have paid nonuniformed employees may be levied by a vote of the people as a fund for pensioned, superannuated, and retired paid nonuniformed employees and for the surviving spouses and dependent children of deceased paid nonuniformed employees and dependent parents of deceased employees and to relieve the employees in case of permanent or temporary disability.

At any time that any city in this state shall meet the requirements of this section, then, and in that case, the provisions of this act shall apply to the city.

The fund shall be known as the “pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees” and shall be collected by the sheriffs and collectors as other taxes are collected and by them turned over to the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees, which board is provided for and created in this act.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 1; 1961, No. 501, § 1; 1981, No. 909, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-922.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-105. Board of trustees.

The board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall consist of five (5) members and shall be composed of the mayor, the head of the street department, the city treasurer, who shall be the treasurer of the fund and the general manager of the waterworks, or the superintendent, in the event there is no general manager, who shall be secretary of the board and who shall serve for a period of two (2) years or until his or her successor shall be elected and qualified.

The mayor shall be chair of the board, and the first four (4) members shall elect one (1) other member, who shall be a reputable physician and who shall represent the board of trustees in the examination of any member of the departments upon the claim of disability.

The physician member of the board so selected shall serve for a period of two (2) years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

The board shall have the absolute control and management of the funds provided for in this act and of all moneys donated, paid, or assessed for the relief or pension of disabled, superannuated, and retired paid nonuniformed employees, their surviving spouses, and minor children under the age of sixteen (16), or surviving parent solely dependent upon the employee for support.

The board shall make all necessary rules for its government and the discharge of its duties and shall hear and decide all applications for relief or pensions under this act.

The board's decisions upon all applications, insofar as matters involving the exercise of discretionary powers are involved, shall be final and conclusive and not subject to review or reversal except by the board.

The board shall cause to be kept a record of all its meetings and proceedings.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-924, 19-925; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2904.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-106. List of retired employees.

There shall be kept in the office of the board of trustees pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees, by the secretary, a book known as the “list of retired paid nonuniformed employees”.

The book shall give the full and complete history and record of action of the board in retiring any and all persons under this act.

The record shall give the name, date of joining the service or department, date of retirement and reason thereof, and the date and finding of the physician of each examination made of disabled employees retired under the provisions of this act.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-933.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-107. Treasurer as custodian of fund.

The treasurer shall be custodian of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees and shall keep his or her books and accounts concerning the fund in such manner as may be prescribed by the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees.

The books and accounts shall be subject to the inspection of any member of the board or of any of the paid nonuniformed employees.

Within ten (10) days after assuming his or her duties under this act, the treasurer shall execute a bond to the board with good and sufficient securities and in such penal sum as the board shall direct, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office. He or she shall surrender and deliver to his or her successor all unexpended moneys and all property which may have come into his or her hands as treasurer of the fund.

The bond shall be filed in the office of the board of trustees and in case of a breach of the bond, suit may be brought on the bond in the name of the board or of any person or persons injured by the breach.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-938.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-108. Deposit of moneys.

The board shall deposit all moneys in the bank selected as the fiscal agent of the city in which it is located, but only if the moneys draw the same rate of interest as the city receives on its deposits. Otherwise, the board shall make its own selection of the bank.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-935.

24-12-109. Investment.

The board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall have the power to draw sums from its treasury to invest in the name of the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees in interest-bearing bonds of the United States, of the State of Arkansas, or of the city in which the board is located or in a local government joint investment trust pursuant to the Local Government Joint Investment Trust Act, § 19-8-301 et seq.

All securities shall be deposited with the treasurer of the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund and shall be subject to the orders of the board.

In those pension and relief funds for paid nonuniformed employees in which assets exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the board of trustees may employ:

An investment advisor to invest the assets, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by law upon the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

A trustee or custodian to hold the assets.

The investments shall not be limited to interest-bearing bonds.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-926; Acts 1993, No. 1130, § 1; 1995, No. 615, § 4; 2009, No. 1201, § 7; 2013, No. 1065, § 14.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c)(1), inserted (c)(1)(B), redesignated the existing text accordingly, and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment, in (c)(1)(A), deleted “as defined in § 24-10-402(a)(2)(A)(ii)” following “advisor”, and substituted “Public Employees' Retirement System” for “Local Police and Fire Retirement System, as provided by § 24-10-401 et seq.”

24-12-110. Payments.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, all moneys paid from the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall be paid by the treasurer only upon warrants signed by the chair and countersigned by the secretary thereof.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no warrant shall be drawn except by the order of the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees, and interest accruing from the fund, while on deposit or otherwise, shall constitute a part of the fund.

In a pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees in which the board has employed a trustee or custodian under § 24-12-109(c) to hold the assets, the trustee or custodian may pay benefits to persons and beneficiaries entitled to benefits under the fund as directed by the board.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-927; Acts 2009, No. 1201, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” in (a) and (b); added (c); and made related changes.

24-12-111. Moneys added to fund — Refunds.

There shall be added to the fund pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees the following moneys:

All moneys given or donated to the fund; and

Not less than six percent (6%) of the monthly salary of each employee, to be deducted each month by the city or its proper agency and immediately paid to the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees.

Employers shall contribute to the fund not less than six percent (6%) of the employee's salary.

Both the employees and employers shall contribute to the fund equal amounts of covered payroll.

Upon leaving employment with the city, any employee shall be entitled to apply for and receive a refund of the aggregate amount withheld from his or her monthly salary during his or her period of employment with the city and paid into the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees of the city.

Upon receiving a refund of the amounts deducted from his or her monthly salary from the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees of the city, the employee shall forfeit his or her credited service as a member of the pension and relief fund and shall not be eligible thereafter to receive any benefits under the provisions of this act for his or her service.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 2; 1979, No. 421, § 1; 1983, No. 510, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-923.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-112. Proration upon insufficiency of fund.

If at any time there should not be sufficient money in the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees to pay each person a full amount to which he or she may be entitled, the beneficiaries shall be paid by prorating the fund available among them in accordance with the respective benefits being received by them under this act.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-932.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-113. Report on condition of fund.

The board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall report to the council, city commissioner, or city clerk of the city on the condition of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees on the first regular meeting in January of each year.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-936.

24-12-114. Subjection of fund to legal process.

No portion of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall at any time be subject to seizure or to be levied on under any process whatsoever for the payment of any claim or debts held against any disabled or retired employee or the surviving spouse, dependent parent, or minor children under sixteen (16) years of age of a deceased or retired employee.

The fund shall be securely held and distributed for the purpose of pensioning the persons mentioned in this act and for no other person or purpose whatsoever.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-937.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-115. Benefits — Temporary total disability retirement — Voluntary retirement.

The board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees, by a majority vote of the members and with the approval of the physician on the board, shall have the power to retire from service any employee who has become temporarily totally disabled while in the performance of his or her duties when it has been certified to the board in writing by the physician on the board that the employee to be retired because of temporary total disability will be incapacitated, either mentally or physically, from the performance of his or her duties as an employee for a period of three (3) months or more.

It shall be mandatory on the board to retire an employee who has performed faithful service as an employee for a period of twenty (20) years at the employee's option or election, to be exercised by making written application therefor, or to retire an employee who has attained the age of sixty (60) and has served as an employee for at least ten (10) years at the employee's option or election, to be exercised by making written application therefor.

In cases arising under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the board shall place an employee so retired upon the pension roll at one-half (½) pay.

The minimum monthly pension paid to a retired employee shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month regardless of whether the employee's monthly salary shall equal this minimum sum or not.

No employee shall be retired because of disability from natural causes unless he or she has served as an employee for a period of five (5) years.

No employee shall be retired because of a disability of any nature except upon examination and approval of the physician on the board of trustees.

If any employee is retired because of any temporary total disability, it shall be his or her duty to have an examination made of himself or herself by the physician on the board at least one (1) time every thirty (30) days, and if he or she shall have recovered from the disability, it shall be the duty of the board to stop payment of the pension and to place the employee back in service.

The time of his or her retirement shall be considered as continuous service in his or her position.

An employee receiving the examination shall pay to the physician a fee of five dollars ($5.00) for the examination so made.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, §§ 9, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-930, 19-931.

24-12-116. Benefits — Permanent total disability retirement.

If any paid nonuniformed employee, while in the performance of his or her duty, shall become physically or mentally totally and permanently disabled by reason of his or her service from performing his or her departmental duties and this fact shall be certified to by the physician on the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees, it shall be mandatory on the board to retire the disabled employee from service upon one-half (½) pay, which shall be one-half (½) of the monthly compensation received by the employee at the time of his or her retirement.

No such employee shall be retired on a pension of less than six hundred dollars ($600) a year regardless of whether this minimum amount, when broken down into equal monthly installments, should equal one-half (½) of the employee's monthly compensation.

If any employee is retired because of any permanent total disability, it shall be the duty of the employee to have an examination made of himself or herself by the physician on the board at least one (1) time every six (6) months.

An employee receiving the examination shall pay to the physician a fee of five dollars ($5.00) for the examination so made.

If an employee recovers from his or her disability, it shall be the duty of the board to stop payment of his or her pension and place the employee back in service. The time of his or her retirement shall be considered as continuous service in his or her position.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, §§ 7, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-928, 19-931.

24-12-117. Benefits — Death of employee.

If while in the performance of his or her duty any employee shall be killed or die as a result of injuries received in performing that duty, or shall die of a disease contracted by reason of that occupation, or shall die of natural causes while in service, and shall leave a spouse or children under the age of sixteen (16) surviving, the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall direct a payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) monthly from the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees to the spouse, while unmarried, or to the guardian of the minor children until the youngest of the children shall attain the age of sixteen (16).

Should the employee leave no spouse or minor children under sixteen (16) years of age, but a parent solely dependent upon the employee's support, the board shall pay the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) monthly as long as the dependent parent remains unmarried.

If any employee already retired and pensioned under this act shall die while so retired and pensioned, leaving a spouse, minor children under the age of sixteen (16), or dependent parent surviving, then each of them shall also be entitled to a pension under this act.

When entitled to a pension as provided by this act, a spouse, children, or a dependent parent shall make application to the board, through the secretary of the board, on a form to be provided by the board.

Accompanying the application shall be proof of the marriage of the deceased spouse to the claimant.

Proof of birth of children shall be established by birth certificate, baptismal certificate, or other proof recognized by the Division of Vital Records of the Department of Health.

All applications and proof shall be retained in the custody of the board, and due notice of that action shall be registered by the secretary in his or her office.

Every paid nonuniformed employee shall file with the secretary the names of those persons to whom death benefits are to be paid and shall set forth the relationship of the beneficiaries to the employee.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, §§ 8, 13, 19; 1981, No. 909, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-929, 19-934, 19-940.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-12-101.

24-12-118. Funeral expenses.

Whenever an active or retired employee shall die or be killed, the board of trustees of the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees shall appropriate from the pension and relief fund for paid nonuniformed employees the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) to pay the funeral expenses of the decedent.

However, this action shall not operate to reduce payments then being paid pursuant to § 24-12-112.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 147, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-939.

24-12-119. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning retirement plans in cities of first class having commission form of government, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 555, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1947, No. 12, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-630 — 19-632.

24-12-120. City attorneys in cities of the first class and cities of the second class.

Upon approval by the governing body, a city of the first class or city of the second class may provide for retirement benefits established by this section for a city attorney elected or appointed to office.

In all cities of the first class and cities of the second class in this state, any person who shall serve as city attorney of the city for a period of not less than ten (10) years, upon reaching age sixty (60), or any person who shall serve as a city attorney for a period of not less than twenty (20) years, without regard to age, shall be entitled to retire at an annual retirement benefit during the remainder of his or her natural life, payable at the rate of one-half (½) of the salary payable to the city attorney at the time of his or her retirement.

All payments of retirement benefits under this section shall be payable monthly and shall be paid from the general funds of the city.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 370, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-945, 19-946; Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 5.

24-12-121. City clerk — Clerk-treasurer.

A city clerk or clerk-treasurer in a city of the first class may retire from office for the remainder of his or her life at the retirement pay provided in this section if the person has served as city clerk, clerk-treasurer, or city treasurer for:

Not less than ten (10) years, upon reaching sixty (60) years of age; or

Twenty (20) years, without regard to age.

On January 1 of each year, if a retiree under this section has been retired for at least twelve (12) full months, up to a three percent (3%) cost-of-living increase will be added.

Subdivision (a)(2) of this section applies only if approved by the governing body of the city.

Any city clerk, city treasurer, or any person serving as city clerk or clerk-treasurer who shall retire or be succeeded by another city clerk or clerk-treasurer within the provisions of this section shall be paid monthly a sum equal to one-half (½) of the monthly salary received by him or her during the last preceding year of his or her service.

The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its general fund account.

Any city clerk or clerk-treasurer in a city of the first class who has served in another capacity with the same city, and that capacity of service also provides for a retirement plan, may apply all years served in that previous capacity toward the accrual of the vesting period provided for in subsection (a) of this section, if approved by the city council.

Benefits shall be paid proportionally from the various funds applicable to the respective capacities of service. This shall be based on the length of service in each capacity for the city.

Upon the death of any city clerk or clerk-treasurer who retired under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section or any other state statute or any city clerk or clerk-treasurer who dies in office after becoming eligible to retire under subsection (a) of this section or any other state statute, the legally recognized spouse of the city clerk or clerk-treasurer married to the city clerk or clerk-treasurer ten (10) years or longer may receive, at the option of the governing body of the city, one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the retired city clerk or clerk-treasurer was receiving or one-half (½) of the retirement benefit the city clerk or clerk-treasurer who died in office was entitled to receive.

Upon remarriage of the spouse, the benefits shall cease.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 313, §§ 1, 2; 1971, No. 356, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1031, 19-1032; Acts 1987, No. 117, § 1; 1993, No. 1103, § 1; 2007, No. 158, § 1; 2007, No. 293, § 1.

24-12-122. Deputy city clerks.

Any deputy city clerk in a city of the first class who shall have served twenty (20) years as deputy city clerk, who shall have attained the age of sixty-five (65), and who shall retire from office or be succeeded by another deputy city clerk may receive for the remainder of his or her life the retirement pay provided for in this section.

Any deputy city clerk who shall retire or be succeeded by another deputy city clerk within the provisions of this section may be paid monthly a sum equal to one-half (½) of the monthly salary received by him or her during the last preceding year of his or her service.

The retirement pay shall be paid by the city from its general fund account when appropriated for that purpose by the governing body of the city.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 271, §§ 1, 2; 1973, No. 118, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-1033, 19-1034.